vi: Chất gây ô nhiễm mục tiêu: Vi khuẩn; Ký sinh trùng; Động vật nguyên sinh; Vi-rút; Khác
th: สารปนเปื้อนเป้าหมาย: แบคทีเรีย; ปรสิต; โปรโตซัว; ไวรัส; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Ciljna onesnaževala: Bakterije; Paraziti; Praživali; Virusi; Drugo
hu: Célzott szennyeződések: Baktériumok; Paraziták; Egysejtűek (Protozoák); Vírusok; Egyéb
de: Zielgerichtete Schadstoffe: Bakterien; Parasiten; Protozoen; Viren; Sonstige
lt-LT: Tiksliniai teršalai: Bakterijos; Parazitai; Pirmuonys; Virusai; Kita
sv: Riktade föroreningar: Bakterier; Parasiter; Urdjur; Virus; Annat
fi: Kohde-epäpuhtaudet: Bakteerit; Loiset; Alkueläimet; Virukset; Muu
ko: 제거 대상 오염물질: 박테리아; 기생충; 원생동물; 바이러스; 기타
zh-CN: 目标污染物: 细菌; 寄生虫; 原虫; 病毒; 其他
zh-TW: 目標污染物: 細菌; 寄生蟲; 原生動物; 病毒; 其他
fr: Contaminants ciblés: Bactéries; Parasites; Protozoaires; Virus; Autre
pt-PT: Contaminantes específicos: Bactérias; Parasitas; Protozoários; Vírus; Outro
pl: Atakowane zanieczyszczenia: Bakterie; Pasożyty; Pierwotniaki; Wirusy; Inne
da: Målkontaminanter: Bakterier; Parasitter; Protozoer; Vira; Andet
ro-RO: Contaminanți vizați: Bacterii; Paraziți; Protozoare; Virusuri; Altele
en: Targeted contaminants: Bacteria; Parasites; Protozoa; Viruses; Other
sk-SK: Cielenie na nečistoty: Baktérie; Parazity; Prvoky; Vírusy; Iné
cs: Likvidované kontaminanty: Bakterie; Paraziti; Prvoci; Viry; Jiné
nl: Doelgerichte verontreinigingen: Bacteriën; Parasieten; Protozoa; Virussen; Overig
es: Contaminantes específicos: Bacterias; Parásitos; Protozoos; Virus; Otros
it: Contaminanti interessati: Batteri; Parassiti; Protozoi; Virus; Altro
hr-HR: Ciljani onečišćivači: Bakterije; Paraziti; Protozoe; Virusi; Ostalo
pt-BR: Contaminantes-alvo: Bactérias; Parasitas; Protozoários; Vírus; Outros
tr: Hedeflenen kirleticiler: Bakteriler; Parazitler; Protozoonlar; Virüsler; Diğer
bg-BG: Целеви замърсители: Бактерии; Паразити; Протозои; Вируси; Друго
ja: 対象汚染物質: 細菌; 寄生虫; 原虫; ウイルス; その他
nb: Målrettede forurensninger: Bakterier; Parasitter; Protozoer; Virus; Annet
el: Στοχευμένοι ρύποι: Βακτήρια; Παράσιτα; Πρωτόζωα; Ιοί; Άλλο
ru: Целевые загрязнители: Бактерии; Паразиты; Простейшие; Вирусы; Другое